Massachusetts, session 194th, H704.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of "total state target local contribution” and inserting, in place thereof the
following:-
“Total state target local contribution”, the per cent of the total state foundation budget
which is to be funded through required local contributions, provided that the per cent shall be
specified annually in the general appropriations act but shall not exceed 58 per cent.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of "total state target local contribution” and inserting, in place thereof the
following:-
“Total state target local contribution”, the per cent of the total state foundation budget
which is to be funded through required local contributions, provided that the per cent shall be
specified annually in the general appropriations act but shall not exceed 57 per cent.
of 3

SECTION 3. Section 2 of Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of "total state target local contribution” and inserting, in place thereof the
following:-
“Total state target local contribution”, the per cent of the total state foundation budget
which is to be funded through required local contributions, provided that the per cent shall be
specified annually in the general appropriations act but shall not exceed 56 per cent.
SECTION 4. Section 2 of Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of "total state target local contribution” and inserting, in place thereof the
following:-
“Total state target local contribution”, the per cent of the total state foundation budget
which is to be funded through required local contributions, provided that the per cent shall be
specified annually in the general appropriations act but shall not exceed 55 per cent.
SECTION 5. Section 2 of Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking
the definition of "total state target local contribution” and inserting, in place thereof the
following:-
“Total state target local contribution”, the per cent of the total state foundation budget
which is to be funded through required local contributions, provided that the per cent shall be
specified annually in the general appropriations act but shall not exceed 54 per cent.
SECTION 6. Section 2 shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 7. Section 3 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 8. Section 4 shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
of 3

SECTION 9. Section 5 shall take effect on January 1, 2029.
of 3